Illinois, session 104th, SB1181.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Citizen Participation Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5, 15, and 25 and by adding Sections 17 and 632 as follows: 7    (735 ILCS 110/5)8    Sec. 5. Public policy. Pursuant to the fundamental 9philosophy of the American constitutional form of government, 10it is declared to be the public policy of the State of Illinois 11that the constitutional rights of citizens and organizations 12to be involved and participate freely in the process of 13government must be encouraged and safeguarded with great 14diligence. The information, reports, opinions, claims, 15arguments, and other expressions provided by citizens are 16vital to effective law enforcement, the operation of 17government, the making of public policy and decisions, and the 18continuation of representative democracy. The laws, courts, 19and other agencies of this State must provide the utmost 20protection for freedom of the press and the free exercise of 21these rights of petition, speech, association, and government 22participation.23    Civil actions for money damages have been filed against   SB1181 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05566 JRC 15596 b1citizens and organizations of this State as a result of their 2valid exercise of their constitutional rights to petition, 3speak freely, associate freely, and otherwise participate in 4and communicate with government. The press opining, reporting, 5or investigating matters of public concern is participating 6and communicating with the government. There has been a 7disturbing increase in lawsuits termed "Strategic Lawsuits 8Against Public Participation" in government or "SLAPPs" as 9they are popularly called. 10    The threat of SLAPPs significantly chills and diminishes 11citizen participation in government, voluntary public service, 12and the exercise of these important constitutional rights. 13This abuse of the judicial process can and has been used as a 14means of intimidating, harassing, or punishing citizens and 15organizations, including the press, for involving themselves 16in public affairs. 17    It is in the public interest and it is the purpose of this 18Act to strike a balance between the rights of persons to file 19lawsuits for injury and the constitutional rights of persons 20to petition, speak freely, associate freely, and otherwise 21participate in government; to protect and encourage public 22participation in government to the maximum extent permitted by 23law; to establish an efficient process for identification and 24adjudication of SLAPPs; and to provide for attorney's fees and 25costs to prevailing movants. As such, this Act should be 26construed broadly in striking the balance of rights described   SB1181 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05566 JRC 15596 b1in this Act. 2(Source: P.A. 95-506, eff. 8-28-07.) 3    (735 ILCS 110/15)4    Sec. 15. Applicability. This Act applies to any motion to 5dispose of a claim in a judicial proceeding on the grounds that 6the claim is based on, relates to, or is in response to any act 7or acts of the moving party in furtherance of the moving 8party's rights of petition, speech, association, or to 9otherwise participate in government, including freedom of the 10press. The claim does not need to solely pertain to the moving 11party's constitutional rights as this Act applies regardless 12of the motives of the person who brought the claim that the 13moving party is seeking to dispose of. 14    Acts in furtherance of the constitutional rights to 15petition, speech, association, and participation in 16government, including freedom of the press, are immune from 17liability, regardless of intent or purpose, except when not 18genuinely aimed at procuring favorable government action, 19result, or outcome. 20(Source: P.A. 95-506, eff. 8-28-07.) 21    (735 ILCS 110/17 new)22    Sec. 17. Stay. 23    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) 24through (g), on the filing of a motion under Section 15 of this   SB1181 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05566 JRC 15596 b1Act:2        (1) all other proceedings between the moving party and 3    responding party, including discovery and a pending 4    hearing or motion, are stayed; and5        (2) on motion by the moving party, the court may stay a 6    hearing or motion involving another party, or discovery by 7    another party, if the hearing or ruling on the motion 8    would adjudicate, or the discovery would relate to, an 9    issue material to the motion to dispose of a claim under 10    Section 15.11    (b) A stay under subsection (a) remains in effect until 12entry of an order ruling on the motion to dispose of the claim 13under Section 15 and expiration of the time under Section 20 to 14appeal the order.15    (c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e), (f), 16and (g), if a party appeals from an order ruling on the motion 17to dispose of the claim, all proceedings between all parties 18in the action are stayed. The stay remains in effect until the 19conclusion of the appeal.20    (d) During a stay under subsection (a), the court may 21allow limited discovery as provided in Section 20.22    (e) A motion under Section 25 for costs, attorney's fees, 23and expenses is not subject to a stay under this Section.24    (f) A stay under this Section does not affect a party's 25ability voluntarily to dismiss a cause of action in whole or in 26part.  SB1181 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05566 JRC 15596 b1    (g) During a stay under this Section, the court for good 2cause may hear and rule on:3        (1) a motion unrelated to the motion to dispose of the 4    claim under Section 15; and5        (2) a motion seeking a special or preliminary 6    injunction to protect against an imminent threat to public 7    health or safety. 8    (735 ILCS 110/25)9    Sec. 25. Attorney's fees and costs. The court shall award 10a moving party who prevails in a motion under this Act 11reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in connection 12with the motion. The court shall award a responding party who 13prevails in a motion under this Act reasonable attorney's fees 14and costs included in connection with the motion if the court 15finds that the motion was frivolous or filed solely with 16intent to delay the proceeding. 17(Source: P.A. 95-506, eff. 8-28-07.) 18    (735 ILCS 110/32 new)19    Sec. 32. Applicability. The changes made to this Act by 20this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly apply only 21to actions commenced on or after January 1, 2026. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.